Tennessee, session 114, HB2405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-210, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Catastrophic injury" means a permanent impairment or disability:
(A) From one (1) or more of the following:
(i) Paraplegia or permanent paralysis of both legs and the
lower part of the body resulting from traumatic injury or disease to
the spinal cord or brain;
(ii) Legal blindness;
(iii) Loss or loss of use of two (2) or more limbs from any
service-connected cause;
(iv) An acquired injury to the brain or spinal cord, or both,
caused by an external physical force;
(v) Second- or third-degree burns; or
(vi) Injuries to the skin that involve the likelihood of
permanent or protracted disfigurement; or
(B) That is of a nature and severity that would qualify an
employee to receive social security disability insurance (SSDI) benefits or
supplemental security income (SSI); and
HB2405
012312
- 1 -

(2) "State law enforcement officer" means a full-time, salaried employee
of this state who is a commissioned member of the department of safety, an
agent of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, a commissioned employee of
the wildlife resources agency engaged in law enforcement activities on a day-to-
day basis, a commissioned member of the alcoholic beverage commission who
is engaged in law enforcement activities on a day-to-day basis, or a correctional
officer vested with the powers of a law enforcement officer by the commissioner
of correction.
(b) The state insurance committee shall, in approving a health insurance plan
that covers state law enforcement officers, offer or continue to provide health insurance
benefits to the surviving spouse or spouse, as applicable, and eligible dependent
children, including an unborn child, of a state law enforcement officer who, on or after
January 1, 2020, is killed or suffers a catastrophic injury in the line of duty. The officer's
employer shall pay the entire premium of the officer's health insurance plan for the
officer, if injured, officer's spouse or surviving spouse, as applicable, and for each
eligible dependent child of the officer.
(c) The criteria for determination of eligibility of dependent children is the same
as the criteria established by the state insurance committee for state employees and
their families.
(d) If the spouse or surviving spouse, as applicable, is or becomes eligible for
insurance coverage through a subsequent marriage, then the extension of coverage
authorized in this section must be terminated on the first day of the following month. The
state insurance committee may establish specific conditions for extensions in instances
where preexisting conditions may apply during the transfer of coverage.
- 2 - 012312

(e) If insurance coverage under the state plan is terminated for the spouse or
surviving spouse, as applicable, pursuant to subsection (d), but the spouse or surviving
spouse is unable to secure through the new coverage insurance coverage for the eligible
dependent children, the eligible dependent children may continue coverage under this
section; provided, that the eligible dependent children continue to meet all dependent
eligibility requirements.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-27-404(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "law enforcement officers, firefighters," and substituting instead "firefighters".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 27, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Catastrophic injury" has the same meaning as defined in § 8-27-210;
and
(2) "Local law enforcement officer" means a full-time, salaried employee
of a political subdivision who is a sheriff, sheriff's deputy, police officer, chief of
police, or other law enforcement officer whose primary responsibility is the
prevention and detection of crime and apprehension of offenders, or who is a
correctional officer with the political subdivision.
(b) If a political subdivision offers health insurance benefits to local law
enforcement officers, then the political subdivision shall offer or continue to provide
health insurance benefits to the spouse or surviving spouse, as applicable, and eligible
dependent children, including an unborn child, of a local law enforcement officer who, on
or after January 1, 2020, is killed or suffers a catastrophic injury in the line of duty. The
political subdivision shall pay the entire premium of the officer's health insurance plan for
- 3 - 012312

the officer, if injured, officer's spouse or surviving spouse, as applicable, and for each
eligible dependent child of the officer.
(c) A political subdivision that offers or provides health insurance benefits in
accordance with subsection (b) shall notify the commissioner of finance and
administration.
(d) This state shall reimburse a political subdivision that provides health
insurance benefits in accordance with this section in an amount equal to that portion of
health insurance premiums or expenses for COBRA coverage for benefits for which the
political subdivision is responsible.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 012312